test/src/morphology/N-luukk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - luukk e-stem sipuli: # Noun - full paradigm
     luukk+N+Sg+Nom: luukk
     luukk+N+Sg+Gen: luukk
     luukk+N+Sg+Acc: luukk
     luukk+N+Sg+Ill: luu′ǩǩe
     luukk+N+Sg+Loc: luukkâst
     luukk+N+Sg+Com: luukkin
     luukk+N+Ess: luukkân
     luukk+N+Par: luukkâd
     luukk+N+Sg+Abe: luukktää
     luukk+N+Pl+Nom: luukk
     luukk+N+Pl+Gen: luukki
     luukk+N+Pl+Acc: luukkid
     luukk+N+Pl+Ill: luukkid
     luukk+N+Pl+Loc: luukkin
     luukk+N+Pl+Com: luukkivui′m
     luukk+N+Pl+Abe: luukkitää
